Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Examination and Licensing.

Administrative Code. —

For examinations, see 12 AAC 09, art. 3.

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 09, art. 4.

Collateral references. —

11 Am. Jur. 2d, Barbers and Cosmetologists, §§ 7-9.

“Grandfather clause” of statute or ordinance regulating or licensing, 4 ALR2d 667.

Validity, construction, and effect of statute or ordinance regulating beauty shops, or beauty culture schools, 56 ALR2d 879.

Sec. 08.13.070.
License required.

A person may not

practice barbering, hairdressing, hair braiding, manicuring, esthetics, body piercing, tattooing, or permanent cosmetic coloring without a license, temporary permit, temporary license, or student permit unless exempted under AS

08.13.160(d)

;

practice barbering, hairdressing, hair braiding, manicuring, esthetics, body piercing, tattooing, or permanent cosmetic coloring except in a shop or school licensed under this chapter unless exempted under AS

08.13.160(d)

or permitted under AS

08.13.160(e)

;

open or conduct a school of barbering, hairdressing, manicuring, or esthetics without a license;

teach in a school of barbering, hairdressing, manicuring, or esthetics, or supervise an apprentice in barbering, hairdressing, manicuring, or esthetics without an instructor’s license;

operate a shop in violation of AS

08.13.120

;

permit an employee or other person being supervised who is not exempted under AS

08.13.160(d)

to practice barbering, hairdressing, hair braiding, manicuring, esthetics, body piercing, tattooing, or permanent cosmetic coloring without a license, temporary permit, temporary license, or student permit;

permit the use of the person’s license, temporary permit, temporary license, or student permit by another person;

obtain or attempt to obtain a license, temporary permit, temporary license, or student permit by fraudulent means.

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 137 SLA 1986; am § 4 ch 57 SLA 1999; am § 5 ch 93 SLA 2000; am § 5 ch 23 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

The amendments to this section made by ch. 57, SLA 1999 (effective September 1, 2001) and ch. 93, SLA 2000, as amended by ch. 104, SLA 2002 (effective December 1, 2002) were harmonized by the revisor.

Administrative Code. —

For examination applications and standards, see 12 AAC 9, art. 1.

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 9, art. 4.

For schools and curriculum, see 12 AAC 9, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019 inserted “hair braiding,” following “hairdressing,” and “tattooing, or” for “tattooing and” in (1), (2), and (6), and made related changes.

Sec. 08.13.080.
Qualifications of applicants.

An applicant for an examination authorized under AS

08.13.040

must

have successfully completed all courses that a school with a curriculum in barbering approved by the board is required to teach in order to be licensed under AS

08.13.110

if applying for a license to practice barbering; the curriculum may be limited for non-chemical barbering under AS

08.13.100(f)

;

have successfully completed all courses that a school with a curriculum in hairdressing approved by the board is required to teach to be licensed under AS

08.13.110

if applying for a license to practice hairdressing;

have successfully completed all courses that a school with a curriculum in esthetics approved by the board is required to teach in order to be licensed under AS 08.13.110 if applying for a license to practice esthetics;

have served an apprenticeship under AS

08.13.082

;

specify the field of practice in which the applicant intends to teach and have held a license to practice in the field for three years or have held a license in the field for one year and have completed 600 hours of student training as an instructor in the field of practice from a licensed school with a curriculum approved by the board if applying for a license as an instructor, except that a person licensed as an instructor in hairdressing may be an instructor in manicuring for courses that satisfy the requirements of (e) of this section, and the board may, by regulation, establish requirements for other manicuring instructors, including instructors who teach courses that satisfy requirements for an advanced manicurist endorsement; or

have completed course work and, if applicable, an apprenticeship acceptable to the board.

[Repealed, § 12 ch 27 SLA 2015.]

[Repealed, § 12 ch 27 SLA 2015.]

An applicant for a license to practice body piercing, tattooing, or permanent cosmetic coloring shall

satisfy the training requirement of AS

08.13.082(d)

;

by passing a written examination approved by the board, demonstrate to the board or the board’s designee safety, sanitation, sterilization, aseptic, and practice techniques that indicate that the applicant has adequate knowledge of infection control practices and requirements relating to tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing, as applicable; this demonstration may, at the option of the board, also include a practical examination in addition to the written examination; and

pay the appropriate fee.

An applicant for a license to practice manicuring shall

submit documentation that the applicant has completed a course of 12 hours of instruction or training approved by the board that addresses health, safety, and hygiene concerns of manicuring customers and practitioners that are relevant to the practice of manicuring from a school licensed under AS

08.13.110

as a school of manicuring; documentation of completion of the course must include certification from the school that the applicant has passed a test given by the school covering the health, safety, and hygiene concerns of manicuring customers and practitioners that are relevant to the practice of manicuring; and

pay the appropriate fee.

An applicant for an endorsement to a license to practice manicuring or hairdressing indicating that the person is an advanced manicurist shall

hold, or be approved for, a current license issued under this chapter for manicuring or hairdressing;

request the endorsement;

submit documentation from a licensed school of manicuring or hairdressing certifying completion of 250 hours of instruction in manicuring that meets the requirements of AS

08.13.110(e)

;

pass an examination given by the board for advanced manicurists; and

pay the appropriate fee.

An applicant for a license to practice hair braiding shall

apply in writing on a form prescribed by the board;

complete, to the satisfaction of the board, 35 hours of instruction in hair braiding, health, safety, and sanitation

at an accredited school of hairdressing;

at a professional association of hairdressing or hair braiding; or

from an individual or school licensed under this chapter and approved by the board; and

pay the appropriate fee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 137 SLA 1986; am §§ 5, 6 ch 57 SLA 1999; am § 6 ch 93 SLA 2000; am §§ 6, 7 ch 35 SLA 2003; am §§ 2, 12 ch 27 SLA 2015; am §§ 3, 4 ch 12 SLA 2017; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 23 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For examination applications and standards, see 12 AAC 9, art. 1.

For examinations, see 12 AAC 9, art. 3.

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 9, art. 4.

For schools and curriculum, see 12 AAC 9, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective January 1, 2016, in (a), added (a)(4), in (a)(6), deleted “except that a person licensed as an instructor in hairdressing may be an instructor in manicuring for courses that satisfy the requirement of (b) of this section, and the board may, by regulation, establish requirements for other manicuring instructors, including instructors who teach courses that satisfy requirements for an advanced manicurist endorsement” at the end, in (a)(7), deleted “a combination of” following “have completed” and inserted “, if applicable, an” following “course work and”; repealed (b) and (c); and made related changes.

The 2017 amendment, effective June 17, 2017, in (a), deleted former (4), which read, “have successfully completed 250 hours of instruction in manicuring from a school of manicuring or hairdressing licensed under AS

08.13.110

if applying for a license to practice manicuring”, in (5), inserted “, except that a person licensed as an instructor in hairdressing may be an instructor in manicuring for courses that satisfy the requirements of (c) of this section, and the board may, by regulation, establish requirements for other manicuring instructors, including instructors who teach courses that satisfy requirements for an advanced manicurist endorsement” at the end, and made related changes; added (e) and (f).

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), added “the curriculum may be limited for non-chemical barbering under AS

08.13.100(f)

;” at the end of (a)(1); in the introductory language of (d), substituted “body piercing, tattooing, or permanent cosmetic coloring” for “body piercing, or a license to practice tattooing and permanent cosmetic coloring”, in (d)(2),
inserted “, and practice” and made related and stylistic changes; added (g).

Sec. 08.13.082.
Apprenticeship.

The period of apprenticeship required to qualify an applicant for a license to practice barbering is 2,000 hours. The apprenticeship must be served in a shop approved by the board. The apprenticeship may not be completed in less than 12 months from the date of its commencement and must be completed in not more than two years from the date of its commencement. The board may set by regulation a period of apprenticeship of less than 2,000 hours for an applicant for a license to practice non-chemical barbering. The board may not require an applicant for a license to practice non-chemical barbering under AS

08.13.100(f)

to perform apprenticeship hours or practical operations relating to chemical processes, including permanent waving, bleaching, coloring, or chemical straightening.

The period of apprenticeship required to qualify an applicant for a license to practice hairdressing is 2,000 hours. The apprenticeship must be served in a shop approved by the board. The apprenticeship may not be completed in less than one year from the date of its commencement and must be completed in not more than two years from the date of its commencement.

The period of apprenticeship required to qualify an applicant for a license to practice esthetics is 350 hours. The apprenticeship must be served in a shop approved by the board. The apprenticeship may not be completed in less than six months from the date of its commencement and must be completed in not more than one year from the date of its commencement.

The number of hours of training required to qualify an applicant for a license to practice tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing shall be set by the board in regulations. The trainee must be at least 18 years of age when the training commences. The training required under this subsection

may only be received

in a licensed shop in this state under a person who has a practitioner’s license under this chapter in the field in which the trainee seeks training; or

outside the state from a person approved by the board at a site approved by the board;

must include at least 12 hours of training in safety, sanitation, sterilization, aseptic, and other practices necessary to prevent transmission of diseases and infection;

shall be completed in not more than 12 months from the date of its commencement; and

shall be documented by certification from the trainer that the training was successfully completed by the trainee.

[Repealed, § 12, ch. 12, SLA 2017.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 137 SLA 1986; am § 7 ch 57 SLA 1999; am § 7 ch 93 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 27 SLA 2015; am § 12 ch 12 SLA 2017; am §§ 9, 10 ch 24 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For examination applications and standards, see 12 AAC 9, art. 1.

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 9, art. 4.

For schools and curriculum, see 12 AAC 9, art. 5.

For student permits, training, and apprentices, see 12 AAC 9, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective January 1, 2016, added (e).

The 2017 amendment, effective June 17, 2017, repealed (e).

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), added the last two sentences; in the introductory language in (d), substituted “to practice tattooing,” for “either tattooing and” and made related changes.

Sec. 08.13.090.
Examinations and other requirements.

A written examination shall be given to each applicant for examination at a time and place determined by the board. The board may delegate the power of examination to a committee of the board or a board member.

The written examination must cover subjects designated by the board and must test the applicant’s knowledge of sanitary practices, safety of all procedures, and use of instruments, equipment, and chemicals permitted within the field of practice for which the applicant is seeking a license.

The board may by regulation establish requirements for a practical examination for licensure.

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For examination applications and standards, see 12 AAC 9, art. 1.

For examinations, see 12 AAC 9, art. 3.

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 9, art. 4.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 13, ch. 27, SLA 2015, a person holding a valid license to practice manicuring on January 1, 2016 may continue to practice under that license until expiration and may renew the license to practice manicuring if, among other requirements, the person takes and passes a written or oral examination under this section.

Sec. 08.13.100.
License.

The board shall authorize the issuance of a license for the practice of barbering, hairdressing, or esthetics to each qualified applicant who has passed an examination under AS

08.13.090

and meets other applicable requirements under this chapter. The board shall authorize the issuance of a license for the practice of tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing to each applicant who has satisfied the requirements of AS

08.13.080(d)

. The board shall authorize the issuance of a license to practice manicuring to each applicant who has satisfied the requirements of AS

08.13.080(e)

. The board shall authorize the issuance of an endorsement to a license to practice manicuring or hairdressing indicating that the person is an advanced manicurist to each applicant who has satisfied the requirements of AS

08.13.080(f)

. The board shall authorize the issuance of a license for the practice of hair braiding to each applicant who has satisfied the requirements of AS

08.13.080(g)

.

A practitioner license must state the areas of practice (barbering, non-chemical barbering, hairdressing, hair braiding, manicuring, esthetics, tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing) that the practitioner is qualified to perform.

The board may by regulation create areas of limited professional licensing in the field of esthetics. Any limitation must be stated on the license.

A person who holds a current valid license from a board of barbering, hairdressing, manicuring, or esthetics in another state or who is licensed by another state to practice hair braiding, tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing is entitled to a license or endorsement under this chapter without examination or a new period of training in this state. An application must include

proof of a valid license issued by another licensing jurisdiction; and

proof of completed training, testing, and working experience that the board finds to meet the minimum requirements of this state.

A person licensed as an instructor is considered to be licensed as a practitioner and is subject to the same requirements that a practitioner is subject to, in the same area for which the person is licensed as an instructor, except that, for purposes of setting fees under AS

08.01.065

, the department shall consider instructors to be an occupation separate from practitioners. An instructor license shall state the areas of practice (barbering, hairdressing, manicuring, or esthetics) in which the licensee is qualified to instruct and practice.

The board shall by regulation create an area of limited professional licensing in the field of barbering for non-chemical barbering that allows a person to practice barbering without the use of chemicals and chemical processes. The limitation must be stated on the license.

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 137 SLA 1986; am § 14 ch 94 SLA 1987; am §§ 8 — 11 ch 57 SLA 1999; am §§ 8 — 11 ch 93 SLA 2000; am § 8 ch 35 SLA 2003; am §§ 4, 5 ch 27 SLA 2015; am §§ 5, 6 ch 12 SLA 2017; am §§ 11 — 14 ch 23 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For license duration and renewal, see AS

08.01.100

.

Administrative Code. —

For examination applications and standards, see 12 AAC 9, art. 1.

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 9, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective January 1, 2016, in (a), added “manicuring” and “and meets other applicable requirements under this chapter” in the first sentence, deleted the second sentence, which read, “The board shall authorize the issuance of a license to practice manicuring to each applicant who has satisfied the requirements of AS

08.13.080(b)

. The board shall authorize the issuance of an endorsement to a license to practice manicuring or hairdressing indicating that the person is an advanced manicurist to each applicant who has satisfied the requirements of AS

08.13.080(c)

.”, and deleted “or endorsement” after “entitled to a license” in the introductory language of (d).

The 2017 amendment, effective June 17, 2017, in (a), in the first sentence, deleted “manicuring,” following “hairdressing,”, added the third and fourth sentences; in (d), in the first sentence of the introductory language, inserted “or endorsement” following “entitled to a license”.

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), added the last sentence and made stylistic changes; in (b), substituted “barbering, non-chemical barbering, hairdressing, hair braiding;” for “barbering, hairdressing,” and made related changes; in (d), inserted “hair braiding,” following “another state to practice” and made related and stylistic changes; added (f).

Sec. 08.13.110.
School license.

The board shall adopt regulations for the licensing of schools of barbering, hairdressing, manicuring, and esthetics. The regulations must include details of the curriculum, minimum hours of instruction, physical condition of the facilities, and financial responsibility of the owner. The curriculum required for a school of hairdressing must include the curriculum required for a school of manicuring.

[Repealed, § 12 ch 27 SLA 2015.]

[Repealed, § 12 ch 27 SLA 2015.]

The board shall issue a license to a school of manicuring if the school offers a curriculum of 12 hours of instruction or training approved by the board that addresses health, safety, and hygiene concerns of manicuring customers and practitioners that are relevant to the practice of manicuring. A school of manicuring may offer instruction in addition to the 12 hours required for a license, but the board may not issue a license to a school of manicuring if the school requires its students to complete more than 12 hours of the required instruction or training in health, safety, and hygiene concerns before the school will certify that the student has completed the school’s manicuring course for purposes of AS

08.13.080(e)

.

A school of manicuring may seek approval from the board for a curriculum designed to qualify students for an advanced manicurist endorsement. The board shall establish the curriculum requirements applicable under this subsection through its authority under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980; am §§ 12, 13 ch 57 SLA 1999; am § 12 ch 27 SLA 2015; am § 7 ch 12 SLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For schools and curriculum, see 12 AAC 9, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective January 1, 2016, repealed (b) and (c).

The 2017 amendment, effective June 17, 2017, added (d) and (e).

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Board of Barbers and Hairdressers has authority under this section to set requirements for schools, and under AS

08.13.082

, to permit apprenticeship only in “approved” shops so that it retains significant authority to regulate instruction in those professions. September 24, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 08.13.120.
Shop license.

The board shall adopt regulations for the licensing of shops. The regulations must require that a shop for tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing be inspected and certified by the Department of Environmental Conservation as being in compliance with the regulations adopted under AS

44.46.020

before a shop license may be issued under this subsection. A shop owner shall be licensed to operate a shop without examination, but, unless the shop owner is a practitioner, the shop owner may not conduct business without employing a manager who is a practitioner. This subsection does not apply to a shop for the practice of barbering, hairdressing, hair braiding, or esthetics located in a community having a population of less than 1,000 people that is not within 25 miles of a community of more than 1,000 people.

The regulations adopted under (a) of this section must include provisions under which the board may issue a temporary shop license to a person who has a license or temporary permit under this chapter to practice tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing. The temporary shop license authorized under this subsection may only be issued to cover a site where the practitioner intends to hold a workshop or to demonstrate techniques as part of a convention or other special event, as defined by the board, that includes other practitioners of tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing. Each practitioner of tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing who holds a workshop or demonstrates techniques at a convention or special event shall have a separate temporary shop license and a license or temporary permit under this chapter to practice tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing. The board shall issue a temporary shop license upon receipt of an application from a practitioner demonstrating compliance with the regulations adopted under this section and payment of the appropriate fee; however, the temporary shop license may be summarily revoked, without refunding of the fee, if the Department of Environmental Conservation determines after an inspection that the cleanliness or sanitation conditions at the site covered by the temporary license pose a clear and immediate danger to the public health or safety. A licensee may appeal a summary revocation under this subsection to the superior court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980; am §§ 12, 13 ch 93 SLA 2000; am § 15 ch 23 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For examination applications and standards, see 12 AAC 9, art. 1.

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 9, art. 4.

For body piercing, tattooing, or permanent cosmetic coloring shops, see 18 AAC 23, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), inserted “hair braiding,” following “hairdressing,” in the last sentence; made stylistic changes throughout the section.

Sec. 08.13.130.
Display of license or permit.

A practitioner shall display the practitioner’s license in a conspicuous location in the practitioner’s place of business. Each shop owner is responsible for the conspicuous display of the shop’s license and the licenses of employees and individuals renting booths in the shop. A person holding a student permit, temporary license, or temporary permit shall display the permit or license in a conspicuous location in the school in which the person is enrolled or the shop in which the person works. The school or shop owner is responsible for the display of a permit or license for each enrolled student, apprentice, or temporary license holder.

A license issued to a manicurist by the department must state that the manicurist has successfully completed a course of instruction or training in health, safety, and hygiene concerns related to the practice of manicuring.

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980; am § 7 ch 137 SLA 1986; am §§ 14, 15 ch 57 SLA 1999; am § 16 ch 23 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 9, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), rewrote the second sentence, which read, “Each shop owner is responsible for the display of the licenses of employees.”

Sec. 08.13.140.
Lapsed license.

A lapsed license may be reinstated if the license has not been lapsed for a period of more than three years, or otherwise at the discretion of the board, and all renewal and delinquent fees for the period during which the license has been lapsed are paid.

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980; am § 8 ch 137 SLA 1986)

Sec. 08.13.150.
Disciplinary sanctions and grounds for refusal of a license or permit.

The board may, in addition to the actions authorized under AS

08.01.075

, refuse, suspend, or revoke a license, student permit, temporary license, or temporary permit for failure to comply with this chapter, with a regulation adopted under this chapter, with a regulation adopted by the Department of Environmental Conservation under AS

44.46.020

, or with an order of the board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980; am § 16 ch 57 SLA 1999; am § 14 ch 93 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For body piercing, tattooing, or permanent cosmetic coloring shops, see 18 AAC 23, art. 3.

Collateral references. —

Cancellation or suspension irrespective of licensee’s personal fault, validity of statute or rule making specified conduct or condition the ground for, 3 ALR2d 107.

Disqualification, for bias or interest, of member of occupation or profession sitting in license revocation proceeding,
97 ALR2d 1210.

Sec. 08.13.160.
Application of license requirements.

A person holding a valid license to practice barbering under former AS 08.12 is licensed under this chapter and may continue to practice barbering under the conditions imposed by former AS 08.12 and the regulations adopted under former AS 08.12 until the license expires.

A person holding a valid license under former AS 08.28 may continue to practice under the conditions imposed under former AS 08.28 and the regulations adopted under former AS 08.28 until the license expires.

A person holding a valid license issued under former AS 08.12 or former AS 08.28 shall be entitled upon its expiration to a license to practice under this chapter in the field of practice for which the person was originally licensed, without meeting requirements for new licensure.

The licensing and permit provisions of this chapter do not apply to

a person practicing barbering, hairdressing, hair braiding, manicuring, or esthetics in a community having a population of less than 1,000 people that is not within 25 miles of a community of more than 1,000 people and who does not use chemicals or uses only chemicals available to the general public;

a licensed health care professional;

a person licensed by another licensing jurisdiction in a field of practice licensed by this chapter while demonstrating techniques or products to persons holding licenses or permits under this chapter;

a person practicing tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing solely on the person’s own body;

the practice of manicuring by a student as part of instruction in a 12-hour course approved under AS

08.13.110(d)

.

The board shall adopt regulations to permit a person licensed under this chapter to practice barbering, hairdressing, hair braiding, manicuring, or esthetics outside a licensed shop or school for limited purposes including

care of clients confined to an institution or health care facility;

care of clients with limited mobility;

participation in charitable events; and

participation in workshops or demonstrations of techniques or products.

A person licensed under this chapter to practice hairdressing is considered to be licensed to practice manicuring, hair braiding, and limited esthetics under the same license.

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980; am §§ 9, 10 ch 137 SLA 1986; am §§ 17, 18 ch 57 SLA 1999; am §§ 15, 16 ch 93 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 133 SLA 2002; am §§ 6, 7 ch 27 SLA 2015; am §§ 8, 9 ch 12 SLA 2017; am §§ 17 — 19 ch 23 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 9, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective January 1, 2016, deleted (d)(2) and (3), which read, “(2) the practice of manicuring by a student as part of instruction in a 12-hour course approved under AS

08.13.110(b)

;

“(3) a shampoo person;” redesignated the following paragraphs accordingly, and deleted “manicuring and” after “licensed to practice” in (f).

The 2017 amendment, effective June 17, 2017, added (d)(5), and made a related change; in (f), inserted “manicuring” following “licensed to practice”.

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (d), in (d)(1), inserted “hair braiding,” following “hairdressing,” and “does not use chemicals or” following “1,000 people and who”, and made a stylistic change in (d)(4); in the introductory language in (e), inserted “hair braiding, manicuring,” following “hairdressing,”; in (f), inserted “hair braiding,” following “manicuring”.

Sec. 08.13.170.
Temporary permits.

The department shall issue a temporary permit to an applicant for licensing who holds a license to practice barbering, hairdressing, hair braiding, manicuring, esthetics, tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing in another state. The permit is valid until the board either issues a permanent license or rejects the application. The board shall act on an application within six months.

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980; am § 11 ch 137 SLA 1986; am § 19 ch 57 SLA 1999; am § 17 ch 93 SLA 2000; am § 20 ch 23 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 9, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in the first sentence, inserted “hair braiding,” following “hairdressing,” and made a stylistic change.

Sec. 08.13.175.
Temporary license.

A person who meets the requirements of AS

08.13.080(a)(1)

, (2), (3), (4), or (6) is entitled to be temporarily licensed after applying for examination under this chapter if the applicant works under the direct supervision, and within the physical presence, of a person who is licensed in the area of practice for which the applicant has applied for examination. A temporary license issued under this section is valid for 120 days and is nonrenewable. A person may not receive more than one temporary license for each area of practice licensed under this chapter. An application for a temporary license must be signed by the supervising licensee and accompanied by the temporary license fee required under AS

08.13.185

.

History.

(§ 20 ch 57 SLA 1999; am § 8 ch 27 SLA 2015; am § 10 ch 12 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective January 1, 2016, substituted “(5), or (7)” for “(6)”.

The 2017 amendment, effective June 17, 2017, near the beginning of the first sentence, substituted “AS

08.13.080(a)(1)

, (2), (3), (4), or (6)” for “AS

08.13.080(a)(1)

, (2), (3), (4), (5), or (7)”.

Sec. 08.13.180.
Student permits.

A person attending a licensed school of barbering, hairdressing, manicuring, or esthetics and a person apprenticed to a licensed instructor in a shop approved by the board or receiving training from a practitioner of tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing shall obtain a student permit. A student permit to practice barbering or hairdressing is valid for two years. A student permit to practice esthetics, tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing is valid for one year. A student permit may not be renewed, but, upon application, the board may issue a new permit to the same person or extend an expired permit to the date of the next scheduled examination. Credit earned under an expired student permit may be transferred to a new permit as determined by the board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980; am § 12 ch 137 SLA 1986; am § 21 ch 57 SLA 1999; am § 18 ch 93 SLA 2000; am § 9 ch 27 SLA 2015; am § 21 ch 23 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For examination applications and standards, see 12 AAC 9, art. 1.

For schools and curriculum, see 12 AAC 9, art. 5.

For student permits, training, and apprentices, see 12 AAC 9, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective January 1, 2016, added “manicuring,” in the first sentence.

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in the first and third sentences, substituted commas for “and” following “tattooing”.

Sec. 08.13.183.
Use of title; unlicensed use prohibited.

A person licensed to practice manicuring in the state may use the title “licensed nail technician.”

A person who uses the title “licensed nail technician” who is not licensed to practice manicuring under this chapter is guilty of a violation.

History.

(§ 10 ch 27 SLA 2015)

Effective dates. —

Section 16, ch. 27, SLA 2015 makes this section effective January 1, 2016.

Sec. 08.13.185.
Fees.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall set fees under AS

08.01.065

for initial licenses and renewals for the following:

schools;

school owners;

instructor;

shop owner;

practitioner of barbering;

practitioner of hairdressing;

practitioner of manicuring;

practitioner of esthetics;

practitioner of tattooing;

practitioner of body piercing;

temporary shop license;

temporary permit;

temporary license;

student permit;

endorsement for advanced manicuring;

practitioner of hair braiding;

practitioner of permanent cosmetic coloring;

practitioner of non-chemical barbering.

The department shall set fees under AS

08.01.065

for examination and investigation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980; am § 11 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 22 ch 57 SLA 1999; am § 19 ch 93 SLA 2000; am § 11 ch 27 SLA 2015; am § 11 ch 12 SLA 2017; am § 22 ch 23 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective January 1, 2016, deleted “endorsements” in the introductory language of (a), deleted (a)(9), which read, “endorsement for advanced manicurist” and redesignated the following paragraphs accordingly.

The 2017 amendment, effective June, 17, 2017, added (a)(15), and made a related change.

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), deleted “and permanent cosmetic coloring” at the end of (a)(9), added (a)(16) – (18), and made a related change.

Sec. 08.13.190.
Failure to possess a license or permit.

A person who practices barbering, hairdressing, hair braiding, esthetics, tattooing, permanent cosmetic coloring, or body piercing, or operates a shop, or operates a school of barbering, hairdressing, or esthetics, or teaches in a school of barbering, hairdressing, or esthetics, without a license, temporary permit, temporary license, or student permit and who is not exempt under AS

08.13.120

or under AS

08.13.160(d)

is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

A person who practices manicuring, operates a shop for manicuring, operates a school of manicuring, or teaches in a school of manicuring without the appropriate license, temporary permit, temporary license, or student permit and who is not exempt under AS

08.13.120

or

08.13.160(d)

is guilty of a violation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 159 SLA 1980; am §§ 23, 24 ch 57 SLA 1999; am § 20 ch 93 SLA 2000; am § 23 ch 23 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Administrative Code. —

For schools and curriculum, see 12 AAC 9, art. 5.

For student permits, training, and apprentices, see 12 AAC 9, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), inserted “hair braiding,” following “hairdressing,” and made a stylistic change.

Sec. 08.13.195.
Civil penalty.

In addition to any other provision of law, if a person violates AS

08.13.070

or

08.13.217

, the board may enter an order levying a civil penalty.

A civil penalty levied under this section may not exceed $5,000 for each offense. In levying a civil penalty, the board shall set the amount of the penalty imposed under this section after taking into account appropriate factors, including the seriousness of the violation, the economic benefit resulting from the violation, the history of violations, and other matters the board considers appropriate.

Before issuing an order under this section, the board shall provide the person written notice and the opportunity to request, within 30 days of issuance of notice by the board, a hearing on the record.

In connection with proceedings under (a) and (b) of this section, the board may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the disclosure of evidence, and may request the attorney general to bring an action to enforce a subpoena.

A person aggrieved by the levy of a civil penalty under this section may file an appeal with the superior court for judicial review of the penalty under AS

44.62.560

.

If a person fails to pay a civil penalty within 30 days after entry of an order under (a) of this section, or if the order is stayed pending an appeal, within 10 days after the court enters a final judgment in favor of the board of an order appealed under (e) of this section, the board shall notify the attorney general. The attorney general may commence a civil action to recover the amount of the penalty.

An action to enforce an order under this section may be combined with an action for an injunction under AS

08.01.087

.

History.

(§ 21 ch 93 SLA 2000)